src/orthography/spellrelax2.regex
# Copyright © 2015–2019 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
# http://altlab.artsrn.ualberta.ca/
#
# This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
# this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#
# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# Plains Cree long vowel variation.

i (->) %',, # short-i elision
â (->) {ā},, # a + combining macron U+0304
ê (->) {ē},, # e + combining macron U+0304
î (->) {ī},, # i + combining macron U+0304
ô (->) {ō},, # o + combining macron U+0304

Â (->) {Ā},, # A + combining macron U+0304
Ê (->) {Ē},, # E + combining macron U+0304
Î (->) {Ī},, # I + combining macron U+0304
Ô (->) {Ō},, # O + combining macron U+0304

â (->) ā,, # a macron
ê (->) ē,, # e macron
î (->) ī,, # i macron
ô (->) ō,, # o macron

Â (->) Ā,, # A macron
Ê (->) Ē,, # E macron
Î (->) Ī,, # I macron
Ô (->) Ō,, # O macron

a (->) Â,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
e (->) Ê,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
i (->) Î,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
o (->) Ô,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running

â (->) {â},, # a + combining circumflex accent U+0302
ê (->) {ê},, # e + combining circumflex accent U+0302
î (->) {î},, # i + combining circumflex accent U+0302
ô (->) {ô},, # o + combining circumflex accent U+0302

Â (->) {Â},, # A + combining circumflex accent U+0302
Ê (->) {Ê},, # E + combining circumflex accent U+0302
Î (->) {Î},, # I + combining circumflex accent U+0302
Ô (->) {Ô},, # O + combining circumflex accent U+0302

â (->) a,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
ê (->) e,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
î (->) i,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
ô (->) o,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running

# NS 152 materials consistantly write some vowels as long where Arok's write them as short. E.G. NS 152 give 'askîy' and Arok gives 'askiy.'

â (->) A,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
ê (->) E,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
î (->) I,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
ô (->) O,,  # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running

a (->) A,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
e (->) E,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
i (->) I,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
o (->) O,,  # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running

a (->) â,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
e (->) ê,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
i (->) î,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running
o (->) ô,, # THESE to be deleted when the SoMe variant is running

# Dealing with spaces instead of hyphens as separators in multipart words

[ %- ] (->) [ %- ]+,,  # Multiple hyphens into a single hyphen
%- (->) [ %  | %  | %  ]+,, # Multiple non-breaking or standard spaces SPACE + NBSP + NNBSP (in syllabics) to single hyphen

# Dealing with English-influenced divergences from SRO,, and misspellings based on modern pronunciation

k (->) g,,    # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops,, maybe context should be added
t (->) d,,    # intervocalic voiced pronunciation to stops,, maybe context should be added
c (->) j,,    # English influence on spelling <c>
# y (->) w,,  # Mixing glides with each other
# w (->) y,,

[..] (->) h || [ a | i | o | â | ê | î | ô ] _ [ k | p | t ],,   # Excessive preaspiration, might this appear before other stops?
h (->) 0 || [ a | i | o | â | ê | î | ô ] _ [ k | p | t ],,   # Missing preaspiration, might this appear before other stops?

[ a | â ] h (->) â,,
ê h (->) ê,,
[ i | î ] h (->) î,,
[ o | ô ] h (->) ô,

# a h k (->) â k,,
# a h t (->) â t,,
â w e (->) a w ê,,
i w (->) o w,,      # Misspelling based on assimilated pronunciation of underlying /i/ as /o/ before /w/
o w (->) i w,,

c (->) c h       # English influence on spelling <c>
;


# Explanation:
# lexical side (->) input 
# Or, in other words:
# correct (->) in use out there
